Washington statutes.
RCW 16.24.160

Conduct of sale—Disposition of proceeds.

The proceeds of the sale of animals impounded under this chapter, after deducting the costs of sale, shall be impounded in the estray fund of the department of agriculture, and if no valid claim is made within one year from the date of sale, the director of the department of agriculture shall transfer the proceeds of sale to the brand fund of the department to be used for the enforcement of this chapter.

[ 1985 c 415 s 17; 1951 c 31 s 7. Formerly RCW 16.13.070.]